apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
<<<<<<< .mine
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaBbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiLlMmNnÑñOoPpRrSsTtUuVvXxYyZzÁáÉéÍíÓóÚúÜü????QqWwKk</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="infps"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="gerps"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="pmp"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="fts"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

<pardef n="l__prnenc">
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>      
	<e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
     <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
           <l>os</l>
          <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
   	 <l>es</l>
          <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="se__prnenc">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="te__prnenc">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="me__prnenc">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="nos__prnenc">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="vos__prnenc">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="-y__prnenc">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-yos</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-y</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="~/-y__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><a/>-yos</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l><a/>-ys</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><a/>-y</l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e r="RL" lm="le"><p><l></l><r>le</r></p><par n="~/-y__prn"/></e>
    <e r="RL" lm="le"><p><l></l><r>le</r></p><par n="~/-y__prn"/></e>
    <e r="RL" lm="le"><p><l></l><r>le</r></p><par n="~/-y__prn"/></e>
 <e><i>l</i><par n="l__prnenc"/></e>
  <e lm="te"><i>te</i><par n="te__prnenc"/></e>
  <e lm="vos"><i>vos</i><par n="vos__prnenc"/></e>
  <e lm="me"><i>me</i><par n="me__prnenc"/></e>
  <e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="se__prnenc"/></e>
  <e lm="nos"><i>nos</i><par n="nos__prnenc"/></e>
  <e><p><l></l><r>-y</r></p><par n="-y__prnenc"/></e>
    <e r="RL" lm="le"><p><l></l><r>le</r></p><par n="~/-y__prn"/></e>
    <e r="RL" lm="le"><p><l></l><r>le</r></p><par n="~/-y__prn"/></e>
    <e r="RL" lm="le"><p><l></l><r>le</r></p><par n="~/-y__prn"/></e>
 <e><i>l</i><par n="l__prnenc"/></e>
  <e lm="te"><i>te</i><par n="te__prnenc"/></e>
  <e lm="vos"><i>vos</i><par n="vos__prnenc"/></e>
  <e lm="me"><i>me</i><par n="me__prnenc"/></e>
  <e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="se__prnenc"/></e>
  <e lm="nos"><i>nos</i><par n="nos__prnenc"/></e>
  <e><p><l></l><r>-y</r></p><par n="-y__prnenc"/></e>
